Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Chapter 7.2. Health Care Data Reporting.
§ 32.1-276.6.
Patient level data system continued; reporting requirements.

The Virginia Patient Level Data System is hereby continued, hereinafter referred to as the “System.” Its purpose shall be to establish and administer an integrated system for collection and analysis of data which shall be used by consumers, employers, providers, and purchasers of health care and by state government to continuously assess and improve the quality, appropriateness, and accessibility of health care in the Commonwealth and to enhance their ability to make effective health care decisions.

Every inpatient hospital shall submit to the Board patient level data as set forth in this subsection. Every general hospital, ordinary hospital, outpatient surgical hospital or other facility licensed or certified pursuant to Article 1 (§

32.1-123

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of this title and every physician and every oral and maxillofacial surgeon certified to perform certain procedures pursuant to § 54.1-2709.1 performing surgical procedures in his office shall also submit to the board outpatient surgical data as set forth in this subsection. Every oral and maxillofacial surgeon certified to perform certain procedures pursuant to § 54.1-2709 shall submit to the Board outpatient surgical data as set forth in this subsection for only those procedures for which certification is required pursuant to § 54.1-2709.1.Any such hospital, facility, physician or oral and maxillofacial surgeon, as defined in §

32.1-276.3

, may report the required data directly to the nonprofit organization cited in §

32.1-276.4

. Unless otherwise noted, patient level data elements for hospital inpatients and patients having outpatient surgery shall include, where applicable and included on standard claim forms:

Hospital identifier;

Attending physician identifier (inpatient only);

Operating physician or oral and maxillofacial surgeon identifier;

Payor identifier;

Employer identifier as required on standard claims forms;

Patient identifier (all submissions);

Patient sex, race (inpatient only), date of birth (including century indicator), street address, city or county, zip code, employment status code, status at discharge, and birth weight for infants (inpatient only);

Admission type, source (inpatient only), date and hour, and diagnosis;

Discharge date (inpatient only) and status;

Principal and secondary diagnoses;

External cause of injury;

Co-morbid conditions existing but not treated;

Procedures and procedure dates;

Revenue center codes, units, and charges as required on standard claims forms; and

Total charges.

State agencies providing coverage for outpatient services shall submit to the Board patient level data regarding paid outpatient claims. Information to be submitted shall be extracted from standard claims forms and, where available, shall include:

Provider identifier;

Patient identifier;

Physician or oral and maxillofacial surgeon identifier;

Dates of service and diagnostic, procedural, demographic, pharmaceutical, and financial information; and

Other related information.The Board shall promulgate regulations specifying the format for submission of such outpatient data. State agencies may submit this data directly to the nonprofit organization cited in §

32.1-276.4

.

History.

1996, c. 902; 2001, c. 341; 2003, c. 466; 2009, c. 652.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 902, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 1999, c. 691, cl. 1, by c. 764, cl. 2, and by Acts 2002, c. 331, cl. 1, which provided that Chapter 7.2 of Title 32.1 would expire on July 1, 2008, was repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 6 and 21, cl. 1.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 341, in subsection B, added the second sentence, inserted “facility or physician” in the third sentence, in the fourth sentence inserted “Unless otherwise noted,” inserted “and patients having outpatient surgery,” and inserted “where applicable and included on standard claim forms,” inserted “(inpatient only)” in subdivisions 2, 7, 8 and 9, and inserted “(all submissions)” in subdivision 6.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 466, in subsection B, in the first paragraph, inserted “and every oral and maxillofacial surgeon certified to perform certain procedures pursuant to § 54.1-2709.1” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence, and in the second paragraph, deleted “or” following “facility,” and inserted “or oral and maxillofacial surgeon, as defined in §

32.1-276.3

”; inserted “or oral and maxillofacial surgeon” in subdivision B 3; inserted “as required on standard claims forms” in subdivision B 5; inserted “as required on standard claims forms” in subdivision B 14; and inserted “or oral and maxillofacial surgeon” in subdivision C 3.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 652, in subdivision B 7, inserted “street address, city or county” and deleted “patient relationship to insured” following “zip code.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 473 (2009).

§ 32.1-276.7.
Methodology to review and measure the efficiency and productivity of health care providers.

Pursuant to the contract identified in §

32.1-276.4

, and consistent with recommendations set forth in strategic plans submitted and approved pursuant to §

32.1-276.4

, the nonprofit organization shall administer and modify, as appropriate, the methodology to review and measure the efficiency and productivity of health care providers. The methodology shall provide for, but not be limited to, comparisons of a health care provider’s performance to national and regional data, where available, and may include different methodologies and reporting requirements for the assessment of the various types of health care providers which report to it. Health care providers shall submit the data necessary for implementation of the requirements of this section pursuant to regulations of the Board. Individual health care provider filings shall be open to public inspection once they have been received pursuant to the methodology adopted by the Board as required by this section.

The data reporting requirements of this section shall not apply to those health care providers enumerated in (iv) and (v) of the definition of health care providers set forth in §

32.1-276.3

until a strategic plan submitted pursuant to §

32.1-276.4

is approved requiring such reporting and any implementing laws and regulations take effect.

History.

1996, c. 902.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 902, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 1999, c. 691, cl. 1, by c. 764, cl. 2, and by Acts 2002, c. 331, cl. 1, which provided that Chapter 7.2 of Title 32.1 would expire on July 1, 2008, was repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 6 and 21, cl. 1.

§ 32.1-276.7:1.
All-Payer Claims Database created; purpose; reporting requirements.

The Virginia All-Payer Claims Database is hereby created to facilitate data-driven, evidence-based improvements in access, quality, and cost of health care and to promote and improve the public health through the understanding of health care expenditure patterns and operation and performance of the health care system.

The Commissioner shall ensure that the Department meets the requirements to be a health oversight agency as defined in 45 C.F.R. § 164.501.

The Commissioner, in cooperation with the Bureau of Insurance, shall collect paid claims data for covered benefits from data suppliers, which shall include:

Issuers of individual or group accident and sickness insurance policies providing hospital, medical and surgical, or major medical coverage on an expense-incurred basis; corporations providing individual or group accident and sickness subscription contracts; and health maintenance organizations providing a health care plan for health care services, for at least 1,000 covered lives in the most recent calendar year;

Third-party administrators and any other entities that receive or collect charges, contributions, or premiums for, or adjust or settle health care claims for, at least 1,000 Virginia covered lives on behalf of group health plans other than ERISA plans;

Third-party administrators, and any other entities, that receive or collect charges, contributions, or premiums for, or adjust or settle health care claims for, an employer that maintains an ERISA plan that has opted-in to data submission to the All-Payer Claims Database pursuant to subsection P;

The Department of Medical Assistance Services with respect to services provided under programs administered pursuant to Titles XIX and XXI of the Social Security Act;

State government health insurance plans;

Local government health insurance plans, subject to their ability to provide such data and to the extent permitted by state and federal law; and

Federal health insurance plans, to the extent permitted by federal law, including Medicare, TRICARE, and the Federal Employees Health Benefits Plan.Such collection of paid claims data for covered benefits shall not include data related to Medigap, disability income, workers’ compensation claims, standard benefits provided by long-term care insurance, disease specific health insurance, dental or vision claims, or other supplemental health insurance products;

The Commissioner shall ensure that the nonprofit organization executes a standard data submission and use agreement with each entity listed in subsection B that submits paid claims data to the All-Payer Claims Database and each entity that subscribes to data products and reports. Such agreements shall include procedures for submission, collection, aggregation, and distribution of specified data. Additionally, the Commissioner shall ensure that the nonprofit organization:

Protects patient privacy and data security pursuant to provisions of this chapter and state and federal privacy laws, including the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq., as amended); Titles XIX and XXI of the Social Security Act; §

32.1-127.1:03

; Chapter 6 (§

38.2-600

et seq.) of Title 38.2; and the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health (HITECH) Act, as included in the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act (P.L. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115) as if the nonprofit organization were covered by such laws;

Identifies the type of paid claims to be collected by the All-Payer Claims Database and the entities that are subject to the submission of such claims as well as identification of specific data elements from existing claims systems to be submitted and collected, including but not limited to patient demographics, diagnosis and procedure codes, provider information, plan payments, member payment responsibility, and service dates;

Administers the All-Payer Claims Database in a manner to allow for geographic, demographic, economic, and peer group comparisons;

Develops public analyses identifying and comparing health plans by public and private health care purchasers, providers, employers, consumers, health plans, health insurers, and data analysts, health insurers, and providers with regard to their provision of safe, cost-effective, and high-quality health care services;

Uses common data layout or other national data collection standards and methods that utilize a standard set of core data elements for data submissions, as adopted or endorsed by the APCD Council, to establish and maintain the database in a cost-effective manner and to facilitate uniformity among various all-payer claims databases of other states and specification of data fields to be included in the submitted claims, consistent with such national standards, allowing for exemptions when submitting entities do not collect the specified data or pay on a per-claim basis, such exemption process to be managed by the advisory committee created pursuant to subsection E;

Does not disclose or report provider-specific, facility-specific, or carrier-specific reimbursement information, or information capable of being reverse-engineered, combined, or otherwise used to calculate or derive such reimbursement information, from the All-Payer Claims Database;

Promotes the responsible use of claims data to improve health care value and preserve the integrity and utility of the All-Payer Claims Database; and

Requires that all public reports and analyses comparing providers or health plans using data from the All-Payer Claims Database use national standards or, when such national standards are unavailable, provide full transparency to providers or health plans of the alternative methodology used.

The Commissioner shall establish an advisory committee to assist in the formation and operation of the All-Payer Claims Database. Such committee shall consist of (i) a representative from each of the following: a statewide hospital association, a statewide association of health plans, a professional organization representing physicians, a professional organization representing pharmacists, an organization that processes insurance claims or certain aspects of employee benefits plans for a separate entity, a community mental health center who has experience in behavioral health data collection, a nursing home health care provider who has experience with medical claims data, a nonprofit health insurer, and a for-profit health insurer; (ii) up to two representatives with a demonstrated record of advocating health care issues on behalf of consumers; (iii) two representatives of hospitals or health systems; (iv) an individual with academic experience in health care data and cost-efficiency research; (v) a representative who is not a supplier or broker of health insurance from small employers that purchase group health insurance for employees; (vi) a representative who is not a supplier or broker of health insurance from large employers that purchase health insurance for employees, and (vii) a representative who is not a supplier or broker of health insurance from self-insured employers, all of whom shall be appointed by the Commissioner. The Commissioner, the chairman of the board of directors of the nonprofit organization, the Commissioner of Insurance, the Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services, the Director of the Department of Human Resource Management, or their designees, shall serve ex officio.In appointing members to the advisory committee, the Commissioner shall adopt reasonable measures to select representatives in a manner that provides balanced representation within and among the appointments and that any representative appointed is without any actual or apparent conflict of interest, including conflicts of interest created by virtue of the individual’s employer’s corporate affiliations or ownership interests.The nonprofit organization shall provide the advisory committee with details at least annually on the use and disclosure of All-Payer Claims Database data, including reports developed by the nonprofit organization; details on methods used to extract, transform, and load data; and efforts to protect patient privacy and data security.The meetings of the advisory committee shall be open to the public.

The Commissioner shall establish a data release committee to review and approve requests for access to data. The data release committee shall consist of the Commissioner or his designee, and upon recommendation of the advisory committee, the Commissioner shall appoint an individual with academic experience in health care data and cost-efficiency research; a representative of a health insurer; a health care practitioner; a representative from a hospital with a background in administration, analytics, or research; and a representative with a demonstrated record of advocating health care issues on behalf of consumers. In making its recommendations, the advisory committee shall adopt reasonable measures to select representatives in a manner that provides balanced representation within and among the appointments and that any representative appointed is without any actual or apparent conflict of interest, including conflicts of interest created by virtue of the individual’s employer’s corporate affiliations or ownership interests. The data release committee shall ensure that (i) all data approvals are consistent with the purposes of the All-Payer Claims Database as provided in subsection A; (ii) all data approvals comply with applicable state and federal privacy laws and state and federal laws regarding the exchange of price and cost information to protect the confidentiality of the data and encourage a competitive marketplace for health care services; and (iii) the level of detail, as provided in subsection H, is appropriate for each request and is accompanied by a standardized data use agreement.

The nonprofit organization shall implement the All-Payer Claims Database, consistent with the provisions of this chapter, to include:

The reporting of data that can be used to improve public health surveillance and population health, including reports on (i) injuries; (ii) chronic diseases, including but not limited to asthma, diabetes, cardiovascular disease, hypertension, arthritis, and cancer; (iii) health conditions of pregnant women, infants, and children; and (iv) geographic and demographic information for use in community health assessment, prevention education, and public health improvement. This data shall be developed in a format that allows comparison of information in the All-Payer Claims Database with other nationwide data programs and that allows employers to compare their employee health plans statewide and between and among regions of the Commonwealth and nationally.

The reporting of data that payers, providers, and health care purchasers, including employers and consumers, may use to compare quality and efficiency of health care, including development of information on utilization patterns and information that permits comparison of health plans and providers statewide between and among regions of the Commonwealth. The advisory committee created pursuant to subsection E shall make recommendations to the nonprofit organization on the appropriate level of specificity of reported data in order to protect patient privacy and to accurately attribute services and resource utilization rates to providers.

The reporting of data that permits design and evaluation of alternative delivery and payment models.

The reporting and release of data consistent with the purposes of the All-Payer Claims Database as set forth in subsection A as determined to be appropriate by the data release committee created pursuant to subsection F.

Except as provided in subsection O, the nonprofit organization shall not provide data or access to data without the approval of the data release committee. Upon approval, the nonprofit organization may provide data or access to data at levels of detail that may include (i) aggregate reports, which are defined as data releases with all observation counts greater than 10; (ii) de-identified data sets that meet the standard set forth in 45 C.F.R. § 164.514(a); and (iii) limited data sets that comply with the National Institutes of Health guidelines for release of personal health information.

Reporting of data shall not commence until such data has been processed and verified at levels of accuracy consistent with existing nonprofit organization data standards. Prior to public release of any report specifically naming any provider or payer, or public reports in which an individual provider or payers represents 60 percent or more of the data, the nonprofit organization shall provide affected entities with notice of the pending report and allow for a 30-day period of review to ensure accuracy. During this period, affected entities may seek explanations of results and correction of data that they prove to be inaccurate. The nonprofit organization shall make these corrections prior to any public release of the report. At the end of the review period, upon completion of all necessary corrections, the report may be released. For the purposes of this subsection, “public release” means the release of any report to the general public and does not include the preparation of reports for, or use of the All-Payer Claims Database by, organizations that have been approved for access by the data release committee and have entered into written agreements with the nonprofit organization.

The Commissioner and the nonprofit organization shall consider and recommend, as appropriate, integration of new data sources into the All-Payer Claims Database, based on the findings and recommendations of the advisory committee.

Information acquired pursuant to this section shall be confidential and shall be exempt from disclosure by the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.). The reporting and release of data pursuant to this section shall comply with all state and federal privacy laws and state and federal laws regarding the exchange of price and cost information to protect the confidentiality of the data and encourage a competitive marketplace for health care services.

No person shall assess costs or charge a fee to any health care practitioner related to formation or operation of the All-Payer Claims Database. However, a reasonable fee may be charged to health care practitioners who voluntarily access the All-Payer Claims Database for purposes other than data verification.

As used in this section, “provider” means a hospital or physician as defined in this chapter or any other health care practitioner licensed, certified, or authorized under state law to provide covered services represented in claims reported pursuant to this section.

The Commissioner, in consultation with the board of directors of the nonprofit organization, shall develop short-term and long-term funding strategies for the operation of the All-Payer Claims Database to provide necessary funding in excess of any budget appropriation by the Commonwealth.

The nonprofit organization, the Department of Health, the Department of Medical Assistance Services, and the Bureau of Insurance shall have access to data reported by the All-Payer Claims Database pursuant to this section at no cost for the purposes of public health improvement research and activities.

Each employer that maintains an ERISA plan may opt-in to allow a third-party administer or other entity to submit data to the All-Payer Claims Database. For any such employer that opts-in, the third-party administrator or other entity shall (i) submit data for the next reporting period after the opt-in and all future reporting periods until the employer opts-out and (ii) include data from any such employer as part of its data submission, if any, otherwise required by this section. Such an employer may opt-out at any time but shall provide written notice to the third-party administrator or other entity of its decision at least 30 days prior to the start of the next reporting period. No employer that maintains an ERISA plan shall be required to opt-in to data submission to the All-Payer Claims Database, and no third-party administrator or other entity shall be required to submit claims processed before it was contracted to provide services. Each third-party administrator or other entity providing claim administration services for an employer shall submit annually to the nonprofit organization by January 31 of each year a list of the ERISA plans whose employer has opted-in to data submission to the All-Payer Claims Database and a list identifying all employers that maintain an ERISA plan with Virginia employees for which it provides claim administration services. Such information submitted shall be considered proprietary and shall be exempt from disclosure by the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

Any data release shall make use of a masked proxy reimbursement amount, for which the methodology is publicly available and approved by the data release committee except that the Department may request that the nonprofit organization generate the following reports based on actual reimbursement amounts: (i) the total cost burden of a disease, chronic disease, injury, or health condition across the state, health planning region, health planning district, county, or city, provided that the total cost shall be an aggregate amount encompassing costs attributable to all data suppliers and not identifying or attributable to any individual provider, and (ii) any analyses to determine the average reimbursement that is paid for health care services that may include inpatient and outpatient diagnostic services, surgical services or the treatment of certain conditions or diseases. Any additional report of analysis based on actual reimbursement amounts shall require the approval of the data release committee.

The nonprofit organization shall ensure the timely reporting of information by private data suppliers to meet the requirements of this section. The nonprofit organization shall notify private data suppliers of any applicable reporting deadlines. The nonprofit shall notify, in writing, a private data supplier of a failure to meet a reporting deadline, and that failure to respond within two weeks following receipt of the written notice may result in a penalty. The Board may assess a civil penalty of up to $1,000 per week per violation, not to exceed a total of $50,000 per violation, against a private data supplier that fails, within its determination, to make a good faith effort to provide the requested information within two weeks following receipt of the written notice required by this subsection. Civil penalties assessed under this subsection shall be maintained by the Department and used for the ongoing improvement of the All-Payer Claims Database.

History.

2012, cc. 693, 709; 2019, cc. 672, 673.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 693 and 709, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Health promulgate regulations requiring all entities listed in subdivisions B 1 and B 2 of §

32.1-276.7:1

as added by this act to submit paid claims data for covered benefits to the All-Payer Claims Database established pursuant to that section.”

Acts 2012, cc. 693 and 709, cl. 4 provides: “That by December 1, 2012, the Commissioner of Health report to the Governor and the General Assembly on whether the entities listed in subdivisions B 1 and B 2 of §

32.1-276.7:1

as added by this act have executed agreements to submit claims data representing at least 75 percent of privately insured individuals and individuals covered under self-funded group health plans in the Commonwealth, to the extent such submissions have been appropriately authorized, as determined by the Commissioner with assistance from the State Corporation Commission. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘privately insured individuals and individuals covered by self-funded group health plans’ means the total population of Virginia as determined by the 2010 United States census less the number of (i) uninsured individuals as reported in the most recent estimate of the Secretary of Health and Human Resources’ Virginia Health Reform Initiative Advisory Council and (ii) Virginia enrollees in the Medicaid, Family Access to Medical Insurance Security, Medicare, and TRICARE programs and the Federal Employee Health Benefits Plan, each as reported by the Department of Medical Assistance Services.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 672 and 673 are identical, and rewrote the section.

§ 32.1-276.8.
Fees for processing, verification, and dissemination of data.

The Board shall prescribe a reasonable fee for each affected health care provider to cover the costs of the reasonable expenses of establishing and administering the methodology developed pursuant to §

32.1-276.7

. The payment of such fees shall be at such time as the Board designates. The Board may assess a late charge on any fees paid after their due date.In addition, the Board shall prescribe a tiered-fee structure based on the number of enrollees for each health maintenance organization to cover the costs of collecting and making available such data. Such fees shall not exceed $3,000 for each health maintenance organization required to provide information pursuant to this chapter. The payment of such fees shall also be at such time as the Board designates. The Board may also assess a late charge on any fees paid by health maintenance organizations after their due dates.

Except for the fees assessed pursuant to subsection A, the nonprofit organization providing services pursuant to an agreement or contract as provided in §

32.1-276.4

shall not assess any fee against any health care provider that submits data under this chapter that is processed, verified, and timely in accordance with standards established by the Board. The Board shall establish penalties for submission of data in a manner that is inconsistent with such standards.

State agencies shall not be assessed fees for the submission of patient level data required by subsection C of §

32.1-276.6

. Individual employers, insurers, and other organizations may voluntarily provide the nonprofit organization with outpatient data for processing, storage, and comparative analysis and shall be subject to fees negotiated with and charged by the nonprofit organization for services provided.

The nonprofit organization providing services pursuant to an agreement or contract with the Commissioner of Health shall be authorized to charge and collect reasonable fees for the dissemination of patient level data and Health Employer Data and Information Set (HEDIS) data or other approved quality of care or performance information set data; however, the Commissioner of Health, the State Corporation Commission, and the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall be entitled to receive relevant and appropriate data from the nonprofit organization at no charge.

The Board shall (i) maintain records of its activities; (ii) collect and account for all fees and deposit the moneys so collected into a special fund from which the expenses attributed to this chapter shall be paid; and (iii) enforce all regulations promulgated by it pursuant to this chapter.

History.

1996, c. 902; 1999, c. 764; 2000, c. 897; 2001, c. 341; 2003, c. 472; 2009, cc. 813, 840.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 902, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 1999, c. 691, cl. 1, by c. 764, cl. 2, and by Acts 2002, c. 331, cl. 1, which provided that Chapter 7.2 of Title 32.1 would expire on July 1, 2008, was repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 6 and 21, cl. 1.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 897 added the second paragraph in subsection A, and inserted “or health maintenance organization” in the last sentence of subsection B, and in subsection D, inserted the language beginning “and Health Employer” and ending “State Corporation Commission” and substituted “relevant and appropriate” for “publicly available.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 341 inserted “on inpatients” in subsection A and B, and in subsection B, inserted
“patient level,” and added the last two sentences.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 472 rewrote subsections A and B; and added subsection E.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” in subsection D.

§ 32.1-276.9.
Confidentiality, subsequent release of data and relief from liability for reporting; penalty for wrongful disclosure; individual action for damages.

Patient level data collected pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), shall be considered confidential, and shall not be disclosed other than as specifically authorized by this chapter; however, upon processing and verification by the nonprofit organization, all patient level data shall be publicly available, except patient, physician, and employer identifier elements, which may be released solely for research purposes if otherwise permitted by law and only if such identifier is encrypted and cannot be reasonably expected to reveal patient identities. No report published by the nonprofit organization, the Commissioner, or other person may present information that reasonably could be expected to reveal the identity of any patient. Publicly available information shall be designed to prevent persons from being able to gain access to combinations of patient characteristic data elements that reasonably could be expected to reveal the identity of any patient. The nonprofit organization, in its discretion, may release physician and employer identifier information. Outpatient surgical charge data shall be made publicly available only pursuant to a review by the Joint Commission on Health Care.

No person or entity, including the nonprofit organization contracting with the Commissioner, shall be held liable in any civil action with respect to any report or disclosure of information made under this article unless such person or entity has knowledge of any falsity of the information reported or disclosed.

Any disclosure of information made in violation of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $5,000 per violation. This provision shall be enforceable upon petition to the appropriate circuit court by the Attorney General, any attorney for the Commonwealth, or any attorney for the county, city or town in which the violation occurred. Any penalty imposed shall be payable to the Literary Fund. In addition, any person or entity who is the subject of any disclosure in violation of this article shall be entitled to initiate an action to recover actual damages, if any, or $500, whichever is greater, together with reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs.

History.

1996, c. 902; 2001, c. 341.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 902, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 1999, c. 691, cl. 1, by c. 764, cl. 2, and by Acts 2002, c. 331, cl. 1, which provided that Chapter 7.2 of Title 32.1 would expire on July 1, 2008, was repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 6 and 21, cl. 1.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 341 added the last sentence in subsection A.

§ 32.1-276.9:1.
Health information needs related to reform; work group.

The Commissioner shall direct the nonprofit organization to establish a work group to study continuing health information needs and to develop recommendations for design, development, and operation of systems and strategies to meet those needs. The work group shall include representatives of the Department of Health, the Department of Medical Assistance Services, the Department of Health Professions, the State Corporation Commission’s Bureau of Insurance, the Virginia Health Reform Initiative, the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, the Virginia Association of Health Plans, the Medical Society of Virginia, health care providers, and other stakeholders and shall:

Identify various health information needs related to implementation of health care reform initiatives, including those associated with development and operation of an all-payer claims database, the Virginia Health Information Exchange, the Virginia Health Benefit Exchange, and any other health reform initiatives. In doing so, the work group shall identify the clinical and paid claims information required and the purposes for which such information will be used; and

Identify opportunities for maximizing efficiency and effectiveness of health information systems, reducing duplication of effort related to collection of health information, and minimizing costs and risks associated with collection and use of health information.

The Commissioner shall report on activities, findings, and recommendations of the work group annually to the Governor and the General Assembly no later than December 1 of each year, beginning in 2014.

History.

2012, cc. 693, 709.

§ 32.1-276.10.
Chapter and actions thereunder not to be construed as approval of charges or costs.

Nothing in this chapter or the actions taken by the Board pursuant to any of its provisions shall be construed as constituting approval by the Commonwealth or any of its agencies or officers of the reasonableness of any charges made or costs incurred by any health care provider.

History.

1996, c. 902.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 902, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 1999, c. 691, cl. 1, by c. 764, cl. 2, and by Acts 2002, c. 331, cl. 1, which provided that Chapter 7.2 of Title 32.1 would expire on July 1, 2008, was repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 6 and 21, cl. 1.

§ 32.1-276.11.
Violations.

Any person violating the provisions of this chapter may be enjoined from continuing such violation by application by the Board for relief to a circuit court having jurisdiction over the offending party.

History.

1996, c. 902.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 902, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 1999, c. 691, cl. 1, by c. 764, cl. 2, and by Acts 2002, c. 331, cl. 1, which provided that Chapter 7.2 of Title 32.1 would expire on July 1, 2008, was repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 6 and 21, cl. 1.